Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska64-211
Acknowledgment of written instrument; attorneys; real estate broker or salesman; oath; authorized; prior acknowledgments validated.

(1) It shall be lawful for any attorney or any employer or associate of any such attorney, or for any stockholder, officer, or employee of any professional corporation authorized to practice law and who is a notary public to take the acknowledgment of any written instrument given in connection with the professional activities of such attorney or corporation and to administer an oath to any person executing any such instrument.

(2) It shall be lawful for any real estate broker or salesman or any employee or associate of any such broker and who is a notary public to take the acknowledgment of any written instrument given to or by any client of such broker and to administer an oath to any person or persons executing any such instrument.

(3) Acknowledgments taken or oaths administered prior to February 9, 1976, by any person described in subsections (1) and (2) of this section are hereby ratified and shall in all respects be lawful, valid, and binding.

Laws 1975, LB 121, § 1;

Laws 1976, LB 622, § 2.

Although this section allows a lawyer to take acknowledgments, he may not do so when he is an interested party. Nat. Bank of Commerce Trust & Savings Assn. v. Rhodes, 207 Neb. 44, 295 N.W.2d 711 (1980).